California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(11) Principles and protocols related to injury and illness prevention, hazard communication, general office safety, exposure control, postexposure requirements, and monitoring systems for radiation safety and sterilization systems.

(f) Upon successful completion of the course, students shall receive a certificate of completion as defined in subdivision (e) of Section 1741.

(g) The board may adopt regulations to implement this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2026, Ch. 232, Sec. 2.   (SB 1311)   Effective September 14, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1765.

No person other than a licensed dental hygienist or a licensed dentist may engage in the practice of dental hygiene or perform dental hygiene procedures on patients, including, but not limited to, supragingival and subgingival scaling, dental hygiene assessment, and treatment planning, except for the following persons:

(a) A student enrolled in a dental or a dental hygiene school who is performing procedures as part of the regular curriculum of that program under the supervision of the faculty of that program.

(b) A dental assistant, registered dental assistant, or registered dental assistant in extended functions acting in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(c) A registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions licensed in another jurisdiction performing a clinical demonstration for educational purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 499, Sec. 42.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1767.

The board shall adopt regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 38.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1771.

Any person, other than a person who has been issued a license or permit by the board, who holds himself or herself out as a registered dental assistant, orthodontic assistant permitholder, dental sedation assistant permitholder, or registered dental assistant in extended functions, or uses any other term indicating or implying he or she is licensed or permitted by the board as such, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 499, Sec. 45.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

1773.

The provisions of Sections 1715, 1718, 1718.1, 1718.2, and 1718.3 shall govern the renewal, restoration, reinstatement, and reissuance of licenses issued under this article.

The license shall continue in effect through the date provided in Section 1715 that next occurs after its issuance, when it shall expire if not renewed.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 1766 by Stats. 2002, Ch. 810, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

1777.

While employed by or practicing in a primary care clinic or specialty clinic licensed pursuant to Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code, in a primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code, or a clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, the following shall apply:

(a) A dental assistant, registered dental assistant, or registered dental assistant in extended functions may perform any extraoral duty under the direct supervision of a registered dental hygienist or registered dental hygienist in alternative practice.

(b) A registered dental assistant or a registered dental assistant in extended functions may perform the following procedures under the direct supervision of a registered dental hygienist or a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 1763:

(1) Coronal polishing.

(2) Application of topical fluoride.

(3) Application of sealants, after providing evidence to the board of having completed a board-approved course in that procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 499, Sec. 46.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Dental Corporations [1800. - 1808.]

1800.

A dental corporation is a corporation that is authorized to render professional services, as defined in Sections 13401 and 13401.5 of the Corporations Code, if that corporation, its shareholders, officers, directors, and employees rendering professional services who are dentists, physicians and surgeons, dental assistants, registered dental assistants, registered dental assistants in extended functions, registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in extended functions, or registered dental hygienists in alternative practice are in compliance with the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act (Part 4 (commencing with Section 13400) of Division 3 of Title 1 of the Corporations Code), this article, and other statutes, rules, and regulations applicable to a dental corporation and the conduct of its affairs. Subject to all applicable statutes, rules, and regulations, a dental corporation is entitled to practice dentistry. With respect to a dental corporation, the governmental agency referred to in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act is the Dental Board of California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 549, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1804.

Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 1680 and paragraph (7) of subdivision (a) of Section 1701, the name of a dental corporation and any name or names under which it may be rendering professional services shall include the words “dental corporation” or wording or abbreviations denoting corporate existence.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 66.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1805.

Except as provided in Sections 13401.5 and 13403 of the Corporations Code, each director, shareholder, and officer of a dental corporation shall be a licensed person as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 549, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

1806.

The income of a dental corporation attributable to professional services rendered while a shareholder is a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act) shall not in any manner accrue to the benefit of that shareholder or his or her shares in the dental corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 168, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

1807.

A dental corporation shall not do or fail to do any act the doing of which or the failure to do which would constitute unprofessional conduct under any statute, rule or regulation now or hereafter in effect. In the conduct of its practice, it shall observe and be bound by such statutes, rules and regulations to the same extent as a person holding a license under Section 1634 of this code. The board shall have the same powers of suspension, revocation and discipline against a dental corporation as are now or hereafter authorized by Section 1670 of this code, or by any other similar statute against individual licensees, provided, however, that proceedings against a dental corporation shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the board shall have all the powers granted therein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1968, Ch. 1375.)
-------------------------------------------

1808.

The board may formulate and enforce rules and regulations to carry out the purposes and objectives of this article and the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act, including rules and regulations requiring (a) that the articles of incorporation or bylaws of a dental corporation shall include a provision whereby the capital stock of that corporation owned by a disqualified person (as defined in the Moscone-Knox Professional Corporation Act), or a deceased person, shall be sold to the corporation or to the remaining shareholders of that corporation within the time as the rules and regulations may provide, and (b) that a dental corporation shall provide adequate security by insurance or otherwise for claims against it by its patients arising out of the rendering of professional services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 168, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Dental Hygienists [1900. - 1966.6.]

1900.

It is the intent of the Legislature by enactment of this article to permit the full utilization of registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienists in extended functions in order to meet the dental care needs of all of the state’s citizens.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1901.

(a) There is hereby created in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Dental Hygiene Board of California in which the administration of this article is vested.

(b) Whenever the terms “Dental Hygiene Committee of California” or “committee” are used in this article, they mean the Dental Hygiene Board of California.

(c) Whenever the term “Dental Hygiene Committee of California” is used in any other law, it means the Dental Hygiene Board of California.

(d) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is
 repealed.
 Notwithstanding any other law, the repeal of this section renders the dental hygiene board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 5.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.

For purposes of this article, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Dental hygiene board” means the Dental Hygiene Board of California.

(b) “Dental board” means the Dental Board of California.

(c) “Direct supervision” means the supervision of dental procedures based on instructions given by a licensed dentist who is required to be physically present in the treatment facility during the performance of those procedures.

(d) “General supervision” means the supervision of dental procedures based on instructions given by a
 licensed dentist who is not required to be physically present in the treatment facility during the performance of those procedures.

(e) “Oral prophylaxis” means preventive and therapeutic dental procedures that include bacterial debridements with complete removal, supra and subgingivally, of calculus, soft deposits, plaque, and stains, and the smoothing of tooth surfaces. The objective of this treatment is to create an environment in which the patient can maintain healthy hard and soft tissues.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 2.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.1.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the dental hygiene board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 3.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.2.

(a) A licensee shall report, upon initial licensure and any subsequent application for renewal or inactive license, the practice or employment status of the licensee, designated as one of the following:

(1) Full-time practice or employment in a dental or dental hygiene practice of 32 hours per week or more in California.

(2) Full-time practice or employment in a dental or dental hygiene practice of 32 hours or more outside of California.

(3) Part-time practice or employment in a dental or dental hygiene practice for less than 32 hours per week in California.

(4) Part-time practice or employment in a dental or dental hygiene practice for less than 32 hours per week outside of California.

(5) Dental hygiene administrative employment that does not include direct patient care, as may be further defined by the dental hygiene board.

(6) Retired.

(7) Other practice or employment status, as may be further defined by the dental hygiene board.

(b) Information collected pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be posted on the internet website of the dental hygiene board.

(c) (1) A
 licensee may report on an application for renewal, and the dental hygiene board, as appropriate, shall collect, information regarding the licensee’s cultural background and foreign language proficiency.

(2) Information collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be aggregated on an annual basis, based on categories utilized by the dental hygiene board in the collection of the data, into both statewide totals and ZIP Code of primary practice or employment location totals.

(3) Aggregated information under this subdivision shall be compiled annually, and reported on the internet website of the dental hygiene board as appropriate, on or before July 1 of each year.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature to utilize
 moneys in the State Dental Hygiene Fund to pay any cost incurred by the dental hygiene board in implementing this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 4.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1902.3.

A registered dental hygienist licensed in another state may teach in a dental hygiene college without being licensed in this state if the person has a special permit. A special permit shall remain valid for a period of four years, subject to subdivision (g), after which time the permit shall not be renewed. The dental hygiene board may issue a special permit to practice dental hygiene in a discipline at a dental hygiene college in this state to any person who submits an application and satisfies all of the following eligibility requirements:

(a) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having a pending contract with a California dental hygiene college approved by the dental hygiene board as a full-time or
 part-time professor, associate professor, assistant professor, faculty member, or instructor.

(b) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having graduated from a dental hygiene college approved by the dental hygiene board.

(c) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having been certified as a diplomate of a specialty committee or, in lieu thereof, establishing qualifications to take a specialty committee examination or furnishing satisfactory evidence of having completed an advanced educational program in a discipline from a dental hygiene college approved by the dental hygiene board.

(d) Furnishing satisfactory evidence of having successfully completed an examination in California law and ethics developed and administered by the
 dental hygiene board.

(e) If teaching during clinical practice sessions, furnishing satisfactory evidence of having successfully completed a course in periodontal soft-tissue curettage, local anesthesia, and nitrous oxide-oxygen analgesia approved by the dental hygiene board.

(f) Complying with the fingerprint submission requirements as provided by Section 1916.

(g) Paying an application fee, subject to a biennial renewal fee, as provided by subdivision (k) of Section 1944.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 491, Sec. 1.   (SB 534)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

1903.

(a) (1) The dental hygiene board shall consist of nine members as follows:

(A) Seven members appointed by the Governor as follows:

(i) Two members shall be public members.

(ii) One member shall be a practicing general or public health dentist who holds a current license in California.

(iii) Four members shall be registered dental hygienists who hold current licenses in California. Of the registered dental hygienist members, one shall be licensed either in alternative practice or in
 extended functions, one shall be a dental hygiene educator, and two shall be registered dental hygienists. No public member shall have been licensed under this chapter within five years of the date of their appointment or have any current financial interest in a dental-related business.

(B) One public member appointed by the Senate Committee on Rules.

(C) One public member appointed by the Speaker of the Assembly.

(2) The first appointment by the Senate Committee on Rules or the Speaker of the Assembly pursuant to this subdivision shall be made upon the expiration of the term of a public member that is scheduled to occur, or otherwise occurs, on or after January 1, 2019.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a public health dentist is a dentist whose primary employer or place of employment is in any of the following:

(A) A primary care clinic licensed under subdivision (a) of Section 1204 of the Health and Safety Code.

(B) A primary care clinic exempt from licensure pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 1206 of the Health and Safety Code.

(C) A clinic owned or operated by a public hospital or health system.

(D) A clinic owned and operated by a hospital that maintains the primary contract with a county government to fill the county’s role under Section 17000 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(b) (1) Except as specified in paragraph (2), members of the dental hygiene board shall be appointed for a term of four years. Each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of the member’s successor or until one year shall have lapsed since the expiration of the term for which the member was appointed, whichever comes first.

(2) For the term commencing on January 1, 2012, two of the public members, the general or public health dentist member, and two of the registered dental hygienist members, other than the dental hygiene educator member or the registered dental hygienist member licensed in alternative practice or in extended functions, shall each serve a term of two years, expiring January 1, 2014.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law and subject to subdivision (e), the Governor may appoint to the dental hygiene board a person who previously served as a member of the former committee or dental hygiene board even if the person’s previous term expired.

(d) The dental hygiene board shall elect a president, a vice president, and a secretary from its membership.

(e) No person shall serve as a member of the dental hygiene board for more than two consecutive terms.

(f) A vacancy in the dental hygiene board shall be filled by appointment to the unexpired term.

(g) Each member of the dental hygiene board shall receive a per diem and
 expenses as provided in Section 103.

(h) Each appointing authority shall have the power to remove from office at any time any member of the dental hygiene board appointed by that authority pursuant to Section 106.

(i) The dental hygiene board, with the approval of the director, may appoint a person exempt from civil service who shall be designated as an executive officer and who shall exercise the powers and perform the duties delegated by the dental hygiene board and vested in the executive officer by this article.

(j) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2028, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 6.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2028, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

1904.

The dental hygiene board shall meet at least two times each calendar year and shall conduct additional meetings in appropriate locations that are necessary to transact its business.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 7.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall perform the following functions:

(1) Evaluate all registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienist in extended functions educational programs that apply for approval and grant or deny approval of those applications in accordance with regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board. Any such educational programs approved by the dental board on or before June 30, 2009, shall be deemed approved by the dental hygiene board. Any dental hygiene program accredited by the Commission on Dental Accreditation may be approved.

(2) Withdraw or revoke its prior approval of a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions educational program in accordance with regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board. The dental hygiene board may withdraw or revoke a dental hygiene program approval if the Commission on Dental Accreditation has indicated an intent to withdraw approval or has withdrawn approval.

(3) Review and evaluate all registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienist in extended functions applications for licensure to ascertain whether the applicant meets the appropriate licensing requirements specified by statute and regulations, maintain application records, cashier application fees, issue and
 renew licenses, and perform any other tasks that are incidental to the application and licensure processes.

(4) Determine the appropriate type of license examination consistent with the provisions of this article, and develop or cause to be developed and administer examinations in accordance with regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board.

(5) Determine the amount of fees assessed under this article, not to exceed the actual cost.

(6) Determine and enforce the continuing education requirements specified in Section 1936.1.

(7) Deny, suspend, or revoke a license under this article, or otherwise enforce the provisions of this article. Any such proceedings
 shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, and the dental hygiene board shall have all of the powers granted therein.

(8) Adopt, amend, and revoke rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this article, including the amount of required supervision by a registered dental hygienist, a registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or a registered dental hygienist in extended functions of a registered dental assistant.

(b) The dental hygiene board may employ employees and examiners that it deems necessary to carry out its functions and responsibilities under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 592, Sec. 7.   (SB 861)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

1905.1.

The dental hygiene board may contract with the dental board to carry out this article. The dental hygiene board may contract with the dental board to perform investigations of applicants and licensees under this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 9.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1906.

(a) The dental hygiene board shall adopt, amend, and revoke regulations to implement the requirements of this article.

(b) All regulations adopted by the dental hygiene board shall comply with the provisions of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(c) No regulation adopted by the dental hygiene board shall impose a requirement or a prohibition directly upon a licensed dentist or on the administration of a dental office, unless specifically authorized by this article.

(d) Unless contrary to the
 provisions of this article, regulations adopted by the dental board shall continue to apply to registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienists in extended functions until other regulations are adopted by the dental hygiene board. All references in those regulations to “board” shall mean the dental hygiene board, which shall solely enforce the regulations with respect to registered dental hygienists, registered dental hygienists in alternative practice, and registered dental hygienists in extended functions.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 11.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1907.

The following functions may be performed by a registered dental hygienist, in addition to those authorized pursuant to Sections 1908 to 1914, inclusive:

(a) All functions that may be performed by a registered dental assistant.

(b) All persons holding a license as a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions as of December 31, 2005, are authorized to perform the duties of a registered dental assistant specified in this chapter. All persons issued a license as a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions on or after January 1, 2006, shall apply
 for and receive a registered dental assistant license in accordance with subdivision (d) of Section 1752.1 and successfully complete any additional education required by subdivision (b) of Section 1752.4 prior to performance of the duties of a registered dental assistant specified in this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 483, Sec. 67.   (SB 1453)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1908.

(a) The practice of dental hygiene includes dental hygiene assessment and development, planning, and implementation of a dental hygiene care plan. It also includes oral health education, counseling, and health screenings.

(b) The practice of dental hygiene does not include any of the following procedures:

(1) Diagnosis and comprehensive treatment planning.

(2) Placing, condensing, carving, or removal of permanent restorations.

(3) Surgery or cutting on hard and soft tissue including, but not limited to, the removal of teeth and the cutting and suturing of soft tissue.

(4) Prescribing medication.

(5) Administering local or general anesthesia or oral or parenteral conscious sedation, except for the administration of nitrous oxide and oxygen, whether administered alone or in combination with each other, or local anesthesia pursuant to Section 1909.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1909.

A registered dental hygienist is authorized to perform the following procedures under direct supervision of a licensed dentist, after submitting to the dental hygiene board evidence of satisfactory completion of a course of instruction, approved by the dental hygiene board, in the procedures:

(a) Soft-tissue curettage.

(b) Administration of local anesthesia.

(c) Administration of nitrous oxide and oxygen, whether administered alone or in combination with each other.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 12.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1910.

A registered dental hygienist is authorized to perform the following procedures under general supervision:

(a) Preventive and therapeutic interventions, including oral prophylaxis, scaling, and root planing.

(b) Application of topical, therapeutic, and subgingival agents used for the control of caries and periodontal disease.

(c) The taking of impressions for bleaching trays and application and activation of agents with nonlaser, light-curing devices.

(d) The taking of impressions for bleaching trays and placements of in-office, tooth-whitening devices.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1910.5.

(a) In addition to the duties specified in Section 1910, a registered dental hygienist is authorized to perform the following additional duties, as specified:

(1) Determine which radiographs to perform on a patient who has not received an initial examination by the supervising dentist for the specific purpose of the dentist making a diagnosis and treatment plan for the patient. In these circumstances, the dental hygienist shall follow protocols established by the supervising dentist. This paragraph only applies in the following settings:

(A) In a dental office setting.

(B) In a public health setting, using telehealth, as defined by
 Section 2290.5, for the purpose of communication with the supervising dentist, including, but not limited to, schools, head start and preschool programs, and community clinics.

(2) Place protective restorations, which for this purpose are identified as interim therapeutic restorations, and defined as a direct provisional restoration placed to stabilize the tooth until a licensed dentist diagnoses the need for further definitive treatment. An interim therapeutic restoration consists of the removal of soft material from the tooth using only hand instrumentation, without the use of rotary instrumentation, and subsequent placement of an adhesive restorative material. Local anesthesia shall not be necessary for interim therapeutic restoration placement. Interim therapeutic restorations shall be placed only in accordance with both
 of the following:

(A) In either of the following settings:

(i) In a dental office setting.

(ii) In a public health setting, using telehealth, as defined by Section 2290.5, for the purpose of communication with the supervising dentist, including, but not limited to, schools, head start and preschool programs, and community clinics.

(B) After the diagnosis, treatment plan, and instruction to perform the procedure provided by a dentist.

(b) The functions described in subdivision (a) may be performed by a registered dental hygienist only after completion of a program that includes training in performing
 those functions, or after providing evidence, satisfactory to the dental hygiene board, of having completed a dental hygiene board-approved course in those functions.

(c) No later than January 1, 2018, the dental hygiene board shall adopt regulations to establish requirements for courses of instruction for the procedures authorized to be performed by a registered dental hygienist and registered dental hygienist in alternative practice pursuant to Sections 1910.5 and 1926.05, using the competency-based training protocols established by the Health Workforce Pilot Project (HWPP) No. 172 through the Department of Health Care Access and Information. The dental hygiene board shall use the curriculum submitted by the dental board pursuant to Section 1753.55 to adopt regulatory language for approval of courses of instruction for the interim
 therapeutic restoration. Any subsequent amendments to the regulations for the interim therapeutic restoration curriculum that are promulgated by the dental hygiene board shall be agreed upon by the dental board and the dental hygiene board.

(d) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2018.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 497, Sec. 7.   (SB 1526)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

1911.

(a) A registered dental hygienist may provide, without supervision, educational services, oral health training programs, and oral health screenings.

(b) A registered dental hygienist shall refer any screened patients with possible oral abnormalities to a dentist for a comprehensive examination, diagnosis, and treatment plan.

(c) In any public health program created by federal, state, or local law or administered by a federal, state, county, or local governmental entity, at a sponsored event by a sponsoring
 entity or at a nonprofit organization, a registered dental hygienist may provide, without supervision, dental hygiene preventive services in addition to oral screenings, including, but not limited to, the application of fluorides and pit and fissure sealants. A registered dental hygienist practicing as described in this subdivision may submit, or allow to be submitted, any insurance or third-party claims for patient services performed as authorized in this article.

(d) For purposes of this section, the following shall apply:

(1) “Nonprofit organization” means a
 tax-exempt nonprofit corporation supported and maintained in whole or in substantial part by donations, bequests, gifts, grants, government funds, or contributions, in the form of money, goods, or services, where dental hygiene services are performed. A nonprofit organization shall not be construed to be engaging in the unlicensed practice of dentistry.

(2) “Sponsored event” shall be defined as in paragraph (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 1626.6. 

(3) “Sponsoring entity” shall be defined as in paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) of Section 1626.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 130, Sec. 1.   (SB 653)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1911.5.

Notwithstanding Section 1912, a registered dental hygienist may provide, without supervision, fluoride varnish to a patient.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 130, Sec. 2.   (SB 653)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1912.

Any procedure performed or service provided by a registered dental hygienist that does not specifically require direct supervision shall require general supervision, so long as it does not give rise to a situation in the dentist’s office requiring immediate services for alleviation of severe pain, or immediate diagnosis and treatment of unforeseeable dental conditions that, if not immediately diagnosed and treated, would lead to serious disability or death.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1913.

Unless otherwise specified in this chapter, a registered dental hygienist may perform any procedure or provide any service within the scope of their practice in any setting under the appropriate level of supervision required by this article, if the registered dental hygienist has completed the appropriate education and training required to perform the procedure or provide the service.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 11.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

1914.

A registered dental hygienist may use any material or device approved for use in the performance of a service or procedure within his or her scope of practice under the appropriate level of supervision, if he or she has the appropriate education and training required to use the material or device.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 31, Sec. 47.   Effective January 1, 2009.   Operative July 1, 2009, by Sec. 55 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

1915.

No person other than a registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions or a licensed dentist may engage in the practice of dental hygiene or perform dental hygiene procedures on patients, including, but not limited to, supragingival and subgingival scaling, dental hygiene assessment, and treatment planning, except for the following persons:

(a) A student enrolled in a dental or a dental hygiene school who is performing procedures as part of the regular curriculum of that program under the supervision of the faculty of that program.

(b) A dental assistant acting in
 accordance with the rules of the dental board in performing the following procedures:

(1) Applying nonaerosol and noncaustic topical agents.

(2) Applying topical fluoride.

(3) Taking impressions for bleaching trays.

(c) A registered dental assistant acting in accordance with the rules of the dental board in performing the following procedures:

(1) Polishing the coronal surfaces of teeth.

(2) Applying bleaching agents.

(3) Activating bleaching agents with a nonlaser light-curing device.

(4) Applying pit and fissure sealants.

(d) A registered dental assistant in extended functions acting in accordance with the rules of the dental board in applying pit and fissure sealants.

(e) A registered dental hygienist, registered dental hygienist in alternative practice, or registered dental hygienist in extended functions licensed in another jurisdiction, performing a clinical demonstration for educational purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 473, Sec. 2.   (SB 821)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

1916.

(a) (1) An applicant for licensure under this article shall furnish electronic fingerprint images for submission to state and federal criminal justice agencies, including, but not limited to, the Federal Bureau of Investigation, in order to establish the identity of the applicant and for the other purposes described in this section.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an out-of-state applicant or licensee residing out of state for whom an electronic record of the licensee’s fingerprints does not exist shall furnish a hardcopy of the applicant’s or licensee’s fingerprint card if electronic fingerprint images are not available or shared in the applicant’s or licensee’s
 state of residence.

(b) The dental hygiene board shall submit the fingerprint images or card to the Department of Justice for the purposes of obtaining criminal offender record information regarding state and federal level convictions and arrests, including arrests for which the Department of Justice establishes that the person is free on bail or on their own recognizance pending trial or appeal.

(c) When received, the Department of Justice shall forward to the Federal Bureau of Investigation requests for federal summary criminal history information received pursuant to this section. The Department of Justice shall review the information returned from the Federal Bureau of Investigation and compile and disseminate the response to the dental hygiene board.

(d) The Department of Justice shall provide a response to the
 dental hygiene board pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 11105 of the Penal Code.

(e) The dental hygiene board shall request from the Department of Justice subsequent arrest notification service, as provided pursuant to Section 11105.2 of the Penal Code.

(f) The information obtained as a result of the fingerprinting shall be used in accordance with Section 11105 of the Penal Code, and to determine whether the applicant is subject to denial of licensure pursuant to Division 1.5 (commencing with Section 475) or Section 1943.

(g) The Department of Justice shall charge a fee sufficient to cover the cost of processing the request described in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 456, Sec. 14.   (SB 786)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

1917.

The dental hygiene board shall grant initial licensure as a registered dental hygienist to a person who satisfies all of the following requirements:
